Utah statutes.
57-2-13.   Form for certificate of proof.

The certificate of proof shall be substantially in the following form, to wit:

State of Utah, County of ____

On this __________(month\day\year), before me personally appeared ____, personally known to me (or satisfactorily proved to me by the oath of ____, a competent and credible witness for that purpose, by me duly sworn) to be the same person whose name is subscribed to the above instrument as a witness thereto, who, being by me duly sworn, deposed and said that he resides in ____, county of ____, and state of Utah; that he was present and saw ____, personally known to him to be the signer of the above instrument as a party thereto, sign and deliver the same, and heard him acknowledge that he executed the same, and that he, the deponent, thereupon signed his name as a subscribing witness thereto at the request of said ____.

